Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 23
MOTOR CLUBS

Sec.

§ 49-2301 — 49-2331. Motor clubs — Definitions — License and regulation — Deposit and maintenance of securities — Certificate of authority — Revocation, suspension or refusal to continue certificate — Service contracts — Club agent, licensing procedure — Hearings and appeals — Review of annual statement — Penalty for violations — Deposit of moneys collected — Examination. [Redesignated and Repealed.]